Hawaii statutes.
[§147-123] Cooperative agreements and
contracts to provide agricultural crop certification services. The
department may enter into cooperative agreements with the United States
Department of Agriculture or other agreements and contracts with private parties
or other governmental agencies for the purposes of certifying seed. [L 2003, c
49, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next